Massachusetts, session 194th, H4320.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a
Vocational Admissions Task Force to examine and make recommendations on (1) Chapter 74
admissions policies, (2) the collection, dissemination, and analysis of district-level and statewide
data on Chapter 74 admissions and waitlists, and (3) the standard for review and enforcement of
said policies and data.
SECTION 2. The task force shall consist of 15 members: the house and senate chairs of
the joint committee on education, or their designees, who shall serve as the co-chairs of the task
force; the task force shall also consist of the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on
labor and workforce development, a member of the general court appointed by the senate
minority leader; a member of the general court appointed by the house minority leader; the
commissioner of elementary and secondary education, or a designee, 1 member appointed by the
Massachusetts Association of Vocational Administrators (MAVA), 1 member appointed by the
of 2

Alliance for Vocational Technical Education (AVTE), 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts
Career & Technical Educators Organization (MassCTE), 1 member appointed by the
Massachusetts Association of School Committees (MASC), 1 member appointed by the
Massachusetts Association of School Superintendents (MASS), 1 member appointed by the
Massachusetts Association of Regional Schools (MARS), 1 member of the Gateway Cities
Legislative Caucus, and 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts Municipal Association
(MMA).
SECTION 3. The first meeting of the task force shall take place within 60 days of the
effective date of this act. The task force shall conduct at least one public hearing to receive
testimony from members of the public. The task force shall file a report containing its findings
and recommendations, including legislative recommendations, if any, with the clerks of the
house and senate not later than 12 months following the first meeting of the task force. The
Department of Elementary Education shall not promulgate or otherwise amend its regulations
relative to Chapter 74 admissions prior to the completion of the task force’s report, nor shall the
Department take any other action prior to the completion of the task force’s report that would
otherwise alter, amend, or affect the admissions policies of Chapter 74 schools and programs for
the 2025-2026 or 2026-2027 admission cycles or school years. Any regulatory, policy, or
enforcement action taken by the Department relative to Chapter 74 admissions policies between
March 12, 2025 and the release of the task force report shall be deemed to be in violation of this
Section.
SECTION 4. This act shall be effective upon passage.
of 2